District of Columbia statutes.
3-1205.05

Application for license, registration, or certification.

(a)

An applicant for a license, registration, or certification shall:

(1)

Submit an application to the board regulating the health occupation on the form required by the board; and

(2)

Pay the applicable fees established by the Mayor.

(b)

The social security number of each applicant for a license, registration, or certification issued pursuant to this chapter shall be recorded on the application. If a number other than the social security number is used on the face of the license, registration, or certification, the issuing agency or entity shall keep the applicant’s social security number on file and the applicant shall be so advised.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 505, 33 DCR 729
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 103, 48 DCR 1270
July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(e)(5), 56 DCR 4043
1981 Ed., § 2-3305.5.
D.C. Law 13-269 rewrote the section which had read:
“An applicant for a license shall:
“(1) Submit an application to the board regulating the health occupation on the form required by the board; and
“(2) Pay the applicable fees established by the Mayor.”
D.C. Law 18-26, in the section heading, inserted “registration, or certification”; in subsec. (a), substituted “An applicant for a license, registration, or certification shall:” for “An applicant for a license shall:”; and, in subsec. (b), substituted “ license, registration, or certification issued” for “license issued” and substituted “ license, registration, or certification, the issuing” for “license, the issuing”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 103 of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e)(5) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).